North Dakota, session 69, HB1237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 20.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Nonresident upland and small game license.
Except as provided in section 20.1 - 08 - 04.9, a nonresident may purchase a nonresiden t
upland and small game license to hunt upland and small game, excluding waterfowl, during the
entire upland and small game hunting seasons. The governor, in the governor's proclamation,
may specify the number of licenses that may be issued and the manner in which licenses are to
be issued.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-03-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
20.1-03-07. Licenses to hunt, trap, or fish required of nonresidents.
1. Nonresidents, except as provided in sections 20.1-02-05, 20.1-03-07.3, and
20.1-03-08, may not:
1. a. Hunt, catch, take, or kill any small game without a nonresident small game
license. The nonresident small game license entitles the nonresident to hunt
small game for any period of fourteen consecutive days or any two periods of
seven consecutive days each. The hunting period for which the license is valid
must be designated on the license. A nonresident small game license is not
required to hunt waterfowl under section 20.1-03-07.1 or wild turkeys under
Page No. 1 25.0459.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
section 20.1-04-07. A nonresident may purchase more than one nonresident
small game license per year.
2. b. Trap, catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill any protected fur-bearing animal,
except that nonresidents holding a valid nonresident fur-bearer and nongame
hunting license may hunt only fox and coyote and except that residents of a state
that allows North Dakota residents to trap within that state may purchase a
nonresident reciprocal trapping license to trap in this state. However, a
nonresident holding a valid nonresident reciprocal trapping license may not trap,
catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill bobcats.
3. c. Catch, attempt to catch, take, or kill any fish without having a nonresident fishing
license.
4. d. Hunt, catch, take, or kill any unprotected bird or animal without having a
nonresident nongame hunting license or nonresident fur-bearer and nongame
hunting license.
5. e. Hunt, catch, take, or kill any big game animal without having the respective
nonresident big game license.
2. Each violation of this section is a distinct and separate offense.
Page No. 2 25.0459.01000